Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2185.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part I of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 6SPECIAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO ORDINANCESSec.601. Definitions.602. Duplex, triplex and quadplex housing zoning ordinances.603. Limitations on duplex, triplex and quadplex housing regulation approvals and exactions.§ 601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Application." A proposed subdivision application, zoning permit application, building permit application or other application required by a municipality to provide duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing under this chapter."Concurrency." The capacity of a municipality's infrastructure to accommodate a proposed development permitted under section 602(a). The term includes capacity of water and sewer systems, storm water systems, road safety infrastructure and emergency services."Duplex housing." A residential building with two dwelling units separated by a horizontal or vertical wall."Dwelling unit." A single unit providing complete, independent living facilities for one or more individuals, including permanent facilities for cooking, eating, living, sanitation and sleeping."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or township."Quadplex housing." A residential building with four dwelling units separated by a horizontal or vertical wall."Single-family residence." A structure maintained and used as a single dwelling unit. A dwelling unit that shares one or more walls with another dwelling unit is a single-family residence if the dwelling unit has direct access to a street or thoroughfare and does not share heating facilities, hot water equipment or another facility or service with another dwelling unit."Triplex housing." A residential building with three dwelling units separated by a horizontal or vertical wall.§ 602. Duplex, triplex and quadplex housing zoning ordinances.(a) Permitted use by right.--A zoning ordinance of a 20260HB2185PN2841 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality shall allow duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing as a permitted use by right on any lot on which a single-family residence is permitted by right in the municipality. Zoning, subdivision and design regulations of a municipality that apply to duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing shall be objective and may not be more restrictive than zoning, subdivision and design regulations applicable to single-family residences.(b) Planning agency review.--(1) A municipality may petition the appropriate county or regional planning agency to review a proposed development permitted under subsection (a) and the impact the proposed development will have on existing infrastructure.(2) If a petition is filed, the agency shall review the petition and determine whether existing infrastructure has the capacity to accommodate the proposed development. The agency may require the developer to make reasonable improvements to existing infrastructure as a condition of allowing the development. Required improvements shall be limited to those necessary to upgrade infrastructure capacity for the proposed development.(c) Proof of concurrency.--A municipality may require an applicant to demonstrate proof of concurrency before issuing a permit for a proposed duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing development under this chapter.(d) Applicability.--This section shall apply to all of the following:(1) Duplex housing in a municipality with a population of at least 5,000 residents as of the most recent Federal decennial census or in a municipality zoning district with a 20260HB2185PN2841 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 density that exceeds 300 residents per square mile calculated as the total population as of the most recent Federal decennial census divided by the land area of the municipality as reported by the United States Census Bureau.(2) Duplex housing or triplex housing in a municipality with a population of at least 10,000 residents as of the most recent Federal decennial census or in a municipality zoning district with a density that exceeds 400 residents per square mile calculated as the total population as of the most recent Federal decennial census divided by the land area of the municipality as reported by the United States Census Bureau.(3) Duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing in a municipality with a population of at least 20,000 residents as of the most recent Federal decennial census or in a municipality zoning district with a density that exceeds 500 residents per square mile calculated as the total population as of the most recent Federal decennial census divided by the land area of the municipality as reported by the United States Census Bureau.§ 603. Limitations on duplex, triplex and quadplex housing regulation approvals and exactions.(a) Prohibited regulations.--A municipality may not adopt or enforce a zoning, subdivision or design regulation that:(1) is more restrictive for duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing than for a single-family residence;(2) is more restrictive for a structure with two to four dwelling units than for a similarly sized structure with one dwelling unit;(3) has the effect of physically precluding construction 20260HB2185PN2841 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing;(4) has the effect of precluding the use of a new or existing structure for two to four dwelling units if the structure could otherwise be used for one dwelling unit;(5) has the effect of precluding any individual dwelling unit from containing not less than 500 square feet of floor area;(6) requires the property owner to reside at the property; or(7) requires a minimum number of parking spaces to be provided.(b) Permitting and licensing.--A municipality may not adopt or enforce permitting or licensing requirements for duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing that are more restrictive than those applicable to a similarly situated single-family residence.(c) Reasonable accommodations.--A municipality shall make reasonable accommodations in rules, regulations, ordinances, policies and practices when the accommodations are necessary to allow development or use of duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing.(d) Administrative approval.--If a municipality determines that a proposed subdivision, zoning permit or other development application to construct or use duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing complies with applicable rules, regulations and standards, the municipality shall administratively approve the application. A municipality may not adopt or enforce a regulation that requires a proposed duplex housing, triplex housing or quadplex housing development under this chapter to present or appear at a meeting of the governing body or a board 20260HB2185PN2841 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or commission of the municipality or to seek an approval from the governing body or a board or commission in addition to the approvals otherwise required by this chapter.(e) Time for decision.--A municipality shall approve or deny an application under this chapter within 60 days after receipt of a completed application. If a municipality denies an application, the municipality shall provide the applicant with a written list of defective or deficient items and a description of how the applicant may remedy the items. If a municipality does not approve or deny a completed application within 60 days, the application shall be deemed approved.(f) Prohibited exactions and studies.--A municipality may not require an applicant for an application to:(1) dedicate land or an easement for park or recreational purposes;(2) pay a fee related to park or recreational purposes;(3) provide a transportation impact analysis; or(4) provide another impact analysis or pay an impact fee that:(i) is not directly related to mitigation of an impact for which there is a compelling governmental interest;(ii) is not roughly proportionate to the impact that requires mitigation; or(iii) would not also be required of an applicant for an application to provide a single-family residence or use.(g) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a municipality's authority to apply regulations that are generally applicable to other projects in 20260HB2185PN2841 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the municipality related to sewer and water access, building codes, storm water mitigation or historic preservation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2185PN2841 - 7 - 123